src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection

Moksha language nouns inflect in cases.

NOUNS 

LEXICON N_SARAZ_rus100  homograph of majority language

ава:ава

вальмя:вальмя

вальмя:вальмя

пакся:пакся

пакся:пакся

* LEXICON N_ANDY  анды:анды

анды:анды

анды:анды

LEXICON N_RELAT_OFTA 
LEXICON N_OFTA  

LEXICON N_OFTA-PL 

LEXICON N_PARA  

LEXICON N_PANGA 

LEXICON N_PINGE 
Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra

Floating
Without vowel

LEXICON N_KIAD1GE 
frequent use of vowel stemm
Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra

Floating
Without vowel

LEXICON N_KECHE 
Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra

Floating

Without vowel

тише:тише

тише:тише

LEXICON N_RELAT_PULA 
LEXICON N_PULA  

LEXICON N_KARIUC1KE 

LEXICON N_SEL1ME 

LEXICON N_FS 

LEXICON N_OSH 

LEXICON N_SARAZ 

LEXICON N_J 

LEXICON N_PEJ 

LEXICON N_K 

LEXICON N_FT 

LEXICON N_BT 

LEXICON N_BN 

LEXICON N_KAL 

LEXICON N_T1 

LEXICON N_KIAL1 

LEXICON N_RELAT_PINE 
LEXICON N_PINE 

LEXICON N_KELU_rus100 
LEXICON N_KELU 

NMN

LEXICON NMN_OFTA-PL 

Indefinite
Definite Sg
Possessor Indices

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Possessor Indices

Indefinite
Definite Sg
Definite Sg
Possessor Indices

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Possessor Indices

Indefinite

Indefinite
Definite Sg

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Indefinite
Definite Sg

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Possessor Indices

Indefinite
Definite Sg

Indefinite
Definite Pl

Indefinite
Definite Sg

Indefinite
Definite Pl

SG-NOM-INDEF ;
SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
PXSG1-Sg ;

Indefinite
Definite Pl

SG-NOM-INDEF ;
SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
PXSG1-Sg ;

PL-NOM-INDEF ;
PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;

MUTUAL NOMINAL

Definite Sg
Possessor Indices

Definite Pl
Possessor Indices

Possessor Indices

PXSG1-Pl ;

* *кядь%^PXSG1%>не*
* *кяд00%>не*
* *ярмак%^PXSG1%>%{ЕОØ%}не*
* *ярмак0%>оне*

Ананьина К.И. 2000 53

сельме+N+SP+Gen+Indef
* *сельм%{ЕО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нь*
* *сельмо%>0нь*

* *киза%^А2О%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}*
* *кизо0%>0т0*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mdf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
